src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
registreerata:registreera v43_odd ; ! nowac
rekyleerata:rekyleera v43_odd ;
registreerata:registreera v43_odd ;
adresseerata:adresseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
havareerata:havareera v43_odd ;
aksesseerata:aksesseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
prosesseerata:prosesseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
regisseerata:regisseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
tapetseerata:tapetseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
obduseerata:obduseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
deduseerata:deduseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
reduseerata:reduseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
induseerata:induseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
produseerata:produseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
implanteerata:implanteera v43_odd ; ! nowac
transplanteerata:transplanteera v43_odd ; ! nowac
anonymiseerata:anonymiseera v43_odd ;
arransseerata:arransseera v43_odd ;
marginaliseerata:marginaliseera v43_odd ;
reklameerata:reklameera v43_odd ;
rekryteerata:rekryteera v43_odd ;
rekistreerata:rekistreera v43_odd ;
eksporteerata:eksporteera v43_odd ;
fantaseerata:fantaseera v43_odd ;
fasineerata:fasineera v43_odd ;
kommenteerata:kommenteera v43_odd ;
kopieerata:kopieera v43_odd ;
huoata:huok3a v43_odd ;
opereerata:opereera v43_odd ;
protesteerata:protesteera v43_odd ;
suojata:suoja v43_odd ;
styyrätä:styyrä v43_odd ;
värvätä:värvä v43_odd ;
stereotypifiseerata:stereotypifiseera v43_odd ;
bloggata:blogga v43_odd ;
laahata:laaha v43_odd ;
raahata:raaha v43_odd ;
sahata:saha v43_odd ;
vihata:viha v43_odd ;
puohata:puoha v43_odd ;
murhata:murha v43_odd ;
pauhata:pauha v43_odd ;
friiata:friia v43_odd ;
rajata:raja v43_odd ;
kauko-ohjata:kauko-#ohja v43_odd ;
ohjata:ohja v43_odd ;
pohjata:pohja v43_odd ;
speijata:speija v43_odd ;
puijata:puija v43_odd ;
nojata:noja v43_odd ;
korjata:korja v43_odd ;
maata:maka v43_odd ;
uhata:uhka v43_odd ;
kaakata:kaakka v43_odd ;
prosmata:prosma v43_odd ;
praakata:praakka v43_odd ;
roskata:roska v43_odd ;
traakata:traakka v43_odd ;
lakata:lakka v43_odd ;
pakata:pakka v43_odd ;
peekata:peeka v43_odd ;
publiseerata:publiseera v43_odd ;
hurrata:hurra v43_odd ;
paikata:paikka v43_odd ;
leikata:leikka v43_odd ;
palkata:palkka v43_odd ;
kolkata:kolkka v43_odd ;
nulkata:nulkka v43_odd ;
tankata:tankka v43_odd ;
kaanata:kaana v43_odd ;
vinkata:vinkka v43_odd ;
plokata:plokka v43_odd ;
muokata:muokka v43_odd ;
laukata:laukka v43_odd ;
hukata:hukka v43_odd ;
loukata:loukka v43_odd ;
pruukata:pruukka v43_odd ;
hengata:henka v43_odd ;
tingata:tinka v43_odd ;
haaskata:haaska v43_odd ;
fiskata:fiska v43_odd ;
tiskata:tiska v43_odd ;
tuiskata:tuiska v43_odd ;
puoskata:puoska v43_odd ;
murskata:murska v43_odd ;
vatkata:vatka v43_odd ;
halata:hala v43_odd ;
salata:sala v43_odd ;
pelata:pela v43_odd ;
peilata:peila v43_odd ;
fiilata:fiila v43_odd ;
pilata:pila v43_odd ;
tilata:tila v43_odd ;
syklata:sykla v43_odd ;
grillata:grilla v43_odd ;
nyanseerata:nyanseera v43_odd ;
rullata:rulla v43_odd ;
puolata:puola v43_odd ;
skriinata:skriina v43_odd ;
vekslata:veksla v43_odd ;
koulata:koula v43_odd ;
praamata:praama v43_odd ;
leimata:leima v43_odd ;
huimata:huima v43_odd ;
talmata:talma v43_odd ;
pommata:pomma v43_odd ;
huomata:huoma v43_odd ;
tormata:torma v43_odd ;
tienata:tiena v43_odd ;
lainata:laina v43_odd ;
piinata:piina v43_odd ;
saarnata:saarna v43_odd ;
oornata:oorna v43_odd ;
kruunata:kruuna v43_odd ;
suunata:suunta v43_odd ;
avata:ava v43_odd ;
kelvata:kelpa v43_odd ;
kammata:kampa v43_odd ;
klapata:klappa v43_odd ;
norkata:norkka v43_odd ;
sliipata:sliippa v43_odd ;
krampata:kramppa v43_odd ;
kopata:koppa v43_odd ;
vuopata:vuoppa v43_odd ;
kaupata:kauppa v43_odd ;
vispata:vispa v43_odd ;
klaarata:klaara v43_odd ;
aplodeerata:aplodeera v43_odd ;
varieerata:varieera v43_odd ;
kaukokontroleerata:kauko#kontroleera v43_odd ;
spekuleerata:spekuleera v43_odd ;
mosuneerata:mosuneera v43_odd ;
okkupeerata:okkupeera v43_odd ;
refereerata:refereera v43_odd ;
tapiseerata:tapiseera v43_odd ;
fileteerata:fileteera v43_odd ;
komenteerata:komenteera v43_odd ;
aresteerata:aresteera v43_odd ;
följätä:följä v43_odd ;
uhrata:uhra v43_odd ;
porata:pora v43_odd ;
huorata:huora v43_odd ;
hamstrata:hamstra v43_odd ;
teurata:teura v43_odd ;
skuurata:skuura v43_odd ;
mellata:mella v43_odd ;
tasata:tasa v43_odd ;
veisata:veisa v43_odd ;
hoksata:hoksa v43_odd ;
tansata:tansa v43_odd ;
knipsata:knipsa v43_odd ;
passata:passa v43_odd ;
pussata:pussa v43_odd ;
satsata:satsa v43_odd ;
kousata:kousa v43_odd ;
lahđata:lahta v43_odd ;
jahđata:jahta v43_odd ; 
kehđata:kehta v43_odd ;
sihđata:sihta v43_odd ;
aiđata:aita v43_odd ;
plaarata:plaara v43_odd ;
hätälannata:hätä#lanta v43_odd ;
verrata:verta v43_odd ;
dekoloniseerata:dekoloniseera v43_odd ;
keijata:keija v43_odd ;
jahtata:jaht2a v43_odd ; 
testata:testa v43_odd ;
listata:lista v43_odd ;
eđesvastata:eđes#vasta v43_odd ;
kustata:kusta v43_odd ;
praatata:praatta v43_odd ;
viitata:viitta v43_odd ;
veltata:veltta v43_odd ;
testamentata:testamentta v43_odd ;
printata:printta v43_odd ; 
kartata:kartta v43_odd ;
havata:hava v43_odd ;
krapata:krappa v43_odd ;
raivata:raiva v43_odd ;
veivata:veiva v43_odd ;
kirjata:kirja v43_odd ;
tolvata:tolva v43_odd ;
arvata:arva v43_odd ;
tervata:terva v43_odd ;
korvata:korva v43_odd ;
kuvata:kuva v43_odd ;
skruvata:skruva v43_odd ;
puuhata:puuha v43_odd ;
feirata:feira v43_odd ;
stressata:stressa v43_odd ;
skeitata:skeitta v43_odd ;
poovata:poova v43_odd ;
puhjeta:puhke v43_odd ;
haljeta:halke v43_odd ;
langeta:lanke v43_odd ;
noveta:nope v43_odd ;
katketa:katke v43_odd ;
laueta:lauke v43_odd ;
revetä:repe v43_odd ;
hävetä:häpe v43_odd ;
karhiita:karhi v43_odd_II ;
keritä+Hom1:kerki v43_odd ; ! kerkkiin, kerkisin
solmeta:solme v43_odd ;
levitä:levi v43_odd ;
hävitä:hävi v43_odd ;
inhota:inho v43_odd ;
tuhota:tuho v43_odd ;
vajota:vajo v43_odd ;
livota:liko v43_odd ;
pystösalvata:pystö#salpa v43_odd ;
silkota:silkko v43_odd ;
kovota:koko v43_odd ;
valota:valo v43_odd ;
lullata:lulla v43_odd ;
vainota:vaino v43_odd ;
kirota:kiro v43_odd ;
kađota:kato v43_odd ;
paastota:paasto v43_odd ;
puđota:puto v43_odd ;
siivota:siivo v43_odd ;
truiskuta:truisku v43_odd ;
touhuta:touhu v43_odd ;
kaluta:kalu v43_odd ;
remuta:remu v43_odd ;
pumputa:pumppu v43_odd ;
juoruta:juoru v43_odd ;
pursuta:pursu v43_odd ;
dumpata:dumppa v43_odd ;
kehätä:kehä v43_odd ;
kerjätä:kerjä v43_odd ;
pärjätä:pärjä v43_odd ;
kenkätä:kenkkä v43_odd ;
rynkätä:rynkkä v43_odd ;
värkätä:värkkä v43_odd ;
pykätä:pykkä v43_odd ;
söökätä:söökkä v43_odd ;
fläkätä:fläkkä v43_odd ;
täkätä:täkkä v43_odd ;
pelätä:pelkä v43_odd ;
hylätä:hylkä v43_odd ;
syklätä:syklä v43_odd ;
tällätä:tällä v43_odd ;
höylätä:höylä v43_odd ;
tölmätä:tölmä v43_odd ;
vastaräknätä:vasta#räknä v43_odd ;
kyynnätä:kyynnä v43_odd ;
träänätä:träänä v43_odd ;
levätä:lepä v43_odd ;
ryypätä:ryyppä v43_odd ;
näpätä:näppä v43_odd ;
perätä:perä v43_odd ;
hyyrätä:hyyrä v43_odd ;
häärätä:häärä v43_odd ;
myöđätä:myötä v43_odd ;
silmätä:silmä v43_odd ;
höyrätä:höyrä v43_odd ;
lisätä:lisä v43_odd ;
prässätä:prässä v43_odd ;
ryötätä:ryöttä v43_odd ;
präntätä:pränttä v43_odd ;
syltätä:sylttä v43_odd ;
täivätä:täivä v43_odd ;
tärvätä:tärvä v43_odd ;
ryövätä:ryövä v43_odd ;
aalota:aalto v43_odd ;
modereerata:modereera v43_odd ;
plaanata:plaana v43_odd ;
